Illinois, session 104th, SB883.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Farmland Preservation Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (505 ILCS 75/1)  (from Ch. 5, par. 1301)7    Sec. 1. Short Title. This Act shall be known and and may be 8cited as the "Farmland Preservation Act."9(Source: P.A. 82-945.)